test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-namdasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - намдась: # Verb 'to hear / kuulla' - full paradigm - Type 1, transitive
 #_[4-A-tr]_nəmtə-_’kuulla’_TV_=_Bi-Syll_ə-vartalo_[MDTN-koodit_ə,_yə]
     намдась+V+TV+Ger: [намда, намдась]
     намдась+V+TV+GerFin: намдванзь
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+Abs: намдва
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+Abs: намдвам’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+Abs: намдва’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+Abs: намдван’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+Abs: намдвахана
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+Abs: намдвахад
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+Abs: намдвавна
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+Abs: намдваха’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+Abs: намдваха’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+Abs: намдваха’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+Abs: намдва”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+Abs: намдби
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+Abs: намдби”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+Abs: намдваха”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+Abs: намдваха”на
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+Abs: намдвахат
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+Abs: намдби”мна
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [намдвав, намдвами]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [намдвав, намдвами]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [намдван, намдвани]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [намдвахан, намдвахани]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [намдваханан, намдваханани]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [намдвахадан, намдвахадани]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [намдвавнан, намдвавнани]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [намдвахаюн, намдвахаюни]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [намдвахаюн, намдвахаюни]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [намдвахаюн, намдвахаюни]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [намдбин, намдбини]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [намдбин, намдбини]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [намдби”н, намдби”ни]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [намдваха”н, намдваха”ни]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [намдваха”нан, намдваха”нани]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [намдвахатан, намдвахатани]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [намдби”мнан, намдби”мнани]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: намдвар
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: намдвамд
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: намдванд
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: намдваханд
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: намдвахананд
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: намдвахаданд
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: намдвавнанд
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg2: намдвахаюд
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg2: намдвахаюд
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg2: намдвахают
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: намдбид
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: намдбид
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: намдбит
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: намдвахат
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: намдваха”нат
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: намдвахатат
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: намдби”мнат
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: намдвада
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: намдвамда
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: намдванда
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: намдваханда
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: намдвахананда
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: намдвахаданда
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: намдвавнанда
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg3: намдвахаюда
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg3: намдвахаюда
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg3: намдвахаюта
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: намдбида
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: намдбида
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: намдбита
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: намдвахата
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: намдваха”ната
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: намдвахатата
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: намдби”мната
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: намдвами’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: намдвами
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: намдвами’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: намдвами
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: намдвани’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: намдвани
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: намдвахани’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: намдвахани
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: намдваханани’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: намдваханани
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: намдвахадани’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: намдвахадани
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: намдвавнани’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: намдвавнани
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu1: намдвахаюни’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: намдвахаюни
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu1: намдвахаюни’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: намдвахаюни
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu1: намдвахаюни’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: намдвахаюни
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: намдбини’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: намдбини
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: намдбини’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: намдбини
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: намдби”ни’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: намдби”ни
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: намдваха”ни’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: намдваха”ни
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: намдваха”нани’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: намдваха”нани
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: намдвахатани’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: намдвахатани
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: намдби”мнани’
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: намдби”мнани
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: намдвари’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: намдвамди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: намдванди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: намдваханди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: намдвахананди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: намдвахаданди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: намдвавнанди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu2: намдвахаюди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu2: намдвахаюди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu2: намдвахаюти’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: намдбиди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: намдбиди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: намдбити’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: намдвахати’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: намдваха”нати’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: намдвахатати’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: намдби”мнати’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: намдвади’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: намдвамди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: намдванди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: намдваханди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: намдвахананди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: намдвахаданди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: намдвавнанди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu3: намдвахаюди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu3: намдвахаюди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu3: намдвахаюти’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: намдбиди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: намдбиди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: намдбити’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: намдвахати’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: намдваха”нати’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: намдвахатати’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: намдби”мнати’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: намдвава”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: намдвава”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: намдвана”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: намдвахана”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: намдваханана”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: намдвахадана”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: намдвавнана”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl1: намдвахаюна”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl1: намдвахаюна”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl1: намдвахаюна”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: намдбина”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: намдбина”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: намдби”на”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: намдваха”на”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: намдваха”нана”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: намдвахатана”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: намдби”мнана”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: намдвара”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: намдвамда”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: намдванда”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: намдваханда”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: намдвахананда”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: намдвахаданда”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: намдвавнанда”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: намдвахаюда”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: намдвахаюда”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: намдвахаюта”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: намдбида”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: намдбида”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: намдбита”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: намдвахата”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: намдваха”ната”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: намдвахатата”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: намдби”мната”
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: намдвадо’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: намдвамдо’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: намдвандо’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: намдвахандо’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: намдваханандо’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: намдвахадандо’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: намдвавнандо’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: намдвахаюдо’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: намдвахаюдо’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: намдвахаюто’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: намдбидо’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: намдбидо’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: намдбито’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: намдвахато’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: намдваха”нато’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: намдвахатато’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: намдби”мнато’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Abs: намдвад
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [намдвадав, намдвадув, намдвадами, намдвадми]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [намдвадав, намдвадув, намдвадами, намдвадми]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [намдвадан, намдвадани, намдвадни]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: намдвадар
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: намдвадамд
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: намдваданд
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [намдвадада, намдвадда]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: намдвадамда
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: намдваданда
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [намдвадами’, намдвадми’]
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [намдвадами, намдвадми]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [намдвадами’, намдвадми’]
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [намдвадами, намдвадми]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [намдвадани’, намдвадни’]
#     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [намдвадани, намдвадни]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [намдвадари’, намдвадри’]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: намдвадамди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: намдваданди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [намдвадади’, намдвадди’]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: намдвадамди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: намдваданди’
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [намдвадава”, намдвадва”]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [намдвадава”, намдвадва”]
     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [намдвадана”, намдвадна”]
